Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
PARKS - CITIES

Cross references:

For recreational facilities districts, see article 7 of title 29.

31-25-201. Cities may establish parks - recreational facilities - conservation easements.

Any city has authority, in the manner provided in this part 2, to establish, maintain, and acquire by gift, devise, purchase, or right of eminent domain such lands or interest in land, within or without the municipal limits of such city, as in the judgment of the governing body of such city may be necessary, suitable, or proper for boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roadways or for park or recreational purposes for the preservation or conservation of sites, scenes, open space, and vistas of scientific, historic, aesthetic, or other public interest. The power of eminent domain granted by this section, with respect to the acquisition of lands for parks or recreational purposes for the preservation or conservation of sites, scenes, open space, and vistas of scientific, historic, aesthetic, or other public interest may not be used by any city or city and county to condemn property lying five miles or further from its corporate limits, unless:

The exercise of its power of eminent domain to condemn property outside its corporate limits is required as a condition of a state or federal permit for construction of a new public facility; or

The use of the power of eminent domain to condemn property is necessary for the acquisition of conservation sites on or contiguous to reservoir sites owned by any city or city and county; or

The use of the power of eminent domain to condemn property is predicated on the prior written approval of the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which such property is located, in instances not covered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (1) when the city or city and county has notified such board or boards. The board has sixty days from such notification to deliver its approval or disapproval. If the board fails to take any action or fails to so notify the city or city and county, the city or city and county may proceed with the exercise of its power; or

The land to be condemned is subject to a single comprehensive plan which includes provision of recreational facilities within the county and which has been adopted by both the county and the city seeking to condemn.

"Interests in land", as used in this part 2, means all rights and interests in land less than the full fee interest, including but not limited to future interests, easements, covenants, and contractual rights. Every such interest in land held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, when recorded, shall run with the land to which it pertains for the benefit of the city holding such interest and may be protected and enforced by such city in any court of general jurisdiction by any proceeding at law or in equity.

Any city may unite with any other similarly authorized political subdivision of this state in acquiring, establishing, and maintaining any property which a city is authorized to acquire, establish, or maintain pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1174, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 1264, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1983 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 367, Session Laws of Colorado 1983.

31-25-202. Acquisition by purchase.

No land or interest in land shall be purchased for the purposes set forth in section 31-25-201 (1) until the governing body adopts an ordinance authorizing such purchase which states the location and legal description of the lands to be purchased, the price to be paid, and the manner of payment or unless the proposed purchase of such lands is submitted upon petition pursuant to section 31-25-203 and approved by the registered electors of such city.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1174, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-25-202 and 31-25-213 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-25-203. Acquisition by purchase - petition of electors - bonds - park bonds.

No indebtedness shall be created nor shall any bonds be issued for acquiring such lands or interests in land unless the question of incurring such debt and issuing such bonds has been submitted at a regular election to a vote of those persons qualified to vote on authorization of other bonded indebtedness and approved as required by section 31-15-302 (1)(d).

The governing body, upon petition of the registered electors of such city equal in number to at least one-tenth of the number of such registered electors voting at the last regular election of such city, shall submit at the next regular election either or both of the questions of acquisition or of incurring bonded indebtedness by separate ordinance. In the ordinance submitting the question of the acquisition of such lands or interests in land, the governing body shall state the location of the land or interests in land proposed to be acquired, describing the same by legal subdivisions, wherever practicable, and the consideration to be given for purchase and the manner of payment, and, in the ordinance submitting the question of incurring indebtedness, the governing body shall state the maximum net effective interest rate at which the bonds may be issued. If the only question to be submitted is the acquisition of such properties, the question may be submitted at a regular or special election. If the acquisition or incurring of indebtedness or both have been approved as required by section 31-15-302 (1)(d), the governing body shall acquire such lands or interests in land, incur said indebtedness, or both, pursuant to said authorization.

The parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roads established in any such city, or such part thereof as may be determined by the mayor and park commission, may be paid for in park bonds of the city of date and form prescribed by the park commission, bearing the name of the city, and payable to bearer at such times and in a sufficient period of years to cover the period of payments provided for, with interest annually at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, as may be determined by the commission. The bonds shall be signed by the mayor, countersigned by the auditor, treasurer, or finance director, and attested by the clerk and have the seal of the city with the approval of the president of the park commission, if such commission exists, endorsed thereon. The interest shall be evidenced by suitable coupons attested by a facsimile of the signature of the city clerk.

For the purposes of this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires, "net effective interest rate" of a proposed issue of bonds means the net interest cost of said issue divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of such issue maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from the date of said proposed bonds to their respective maturities. "Net interest cost" of a proposed issue of bonds means the total amount of interest to accrue on said bonds from their date of issuance to their respective maturities plus the amount of any discount below par or less the amount of any premium above par at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases the net effective interest rate and net interest cost shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the bonds.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1175, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-25-204. Acquisition by condemnation.

For the purpose of acquiring lands for parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roads, the park commission is authorized, with the approval of the mayor, to select and, by a suitable proceeding in the name of the city, without the passage of any ordinance, condemn real estate or, with the approval of the mayor, to purchase any real estate so selected for one or more parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, or roads and to select routes and streets for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a system of connecting boulevards and pleasure ways or parkways therein. All such condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with the general laws of the state insofar as the same are applicable, but the benefit to other lands shall be ascertained and assessed.

Payment for any acquisition provided in subsection (1) of this section may be paid for by special assessments upon all the other real estate, except parks, pleasure grounds, avenues, boulevards, streets, and roads in such city or partly out of the proceeds of the sale of the general bonds of the city, in accordance with the powers conferred by this part 2, and partly by such assessments, as the same may be determined by the mayor and park commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1176, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-25-216 and 31-25-217 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-25-205. Bequests for park purposes.

Real or personal property may be granted, bequeathed, devised, or conveyed to the city for the purpose of the improvement or ornamentation of any park, pleasure ground, boulevard, parkway, avenue, driveway, or road or for the establishment or maintenance in parks or pleasure grounds of museums, zoological or other gardens, collections of natural history, observatories, libraries, monuments, or works of art upon such trusts or conditions as may be approved by the commission. All such property or the rents, issues, and profits thereof shall be subject to the exclusive management and control of the commission. Lands or interests in land given or devised to such city for the purposes mentioned in this section shall be accepted or refused by ordinance passed by the governing body.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1176, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-25-202 and 31-25-212 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-25-206. Park commissioners - vacancies.

The care, custody, management, and control of the city parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roads may be vested exclusively in a park commission which shall be composed of six members who shall be registered electors in said city and well-known for their ability, probity, and public spirit, one of whom shall be president of the commission. The mayor of the city shall appoint, with the consent of the governing body, for and on behalf of such city, such park commissioners who shall hold office one-half for one year and one-half for two years from the July 1 following their appointment. At their first regular meeting they shall cast lots for the respective terms. Annually thereafter and before July 1 of each year, the mayor, with the consent of the governing body, shall appoint three commissioners for the ensuing two years to take the place of the retiring commissioners. All vacancies in such park commission arising from any cause shall be filled by the mayor with the consent of the governing body.

The governing body may, by ordinance, provide for abolishment of the park commission and consolidation of the functions and activities specified in this part 2 under the general control and administration of the city as provided by ordinance. The powers conferred upon the park commission as specified in this part 2 may be exercised by the city in the manner provided by ordinance. Any provision of this part 2 to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing body of a city may appoint one or more advisory commissions or boards with respect to parks, recreation, and other municipal functions.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1176, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 332, § 97, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-207. Members serve without compensation - no interest in contracts.

The commissioners shall serve without compensation except for their actual expenses which shall be approved by the mayor. No member of the commission shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in any contract relating to the establishment or maintenance of any of the properties mentioned in section 31-25-201 or in any contract providing for the expenditure of any money in relation thereto. Any commissioner shall vacate his office upon the acceptance of any other public office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-208. Meetings - quorum.

The commission shall hold a regular meeting on the first Tuesday of each month and may by rule provide for special meetings and service of notice thereof. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. No action of the commission shall be binding unless authorized by a majority of the members at a regular or duly called special meeting.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-208 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-209. Secretary - salary - duties.

The commission may employ a secretary at a salary not exceeding twelve hundred dollars per annum, to be fixed by the commission, payable out of the park fund. The secretary shall keep a record of all proceedings of the commission, have custody of and preserve all its records, and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-210. Office of commission - supplies.

The city shall provide the commission with convenient offices, stationery, and the facilities necessary for the performance of its duties as the commission deems necessary and advisable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-211. Superintendent of parks - assistants - salaries.

The commission may appoint a superintendent of parks who shall be a practical landscape gardener who, under the direction of the commission, shall have active charge, control, and direction of all the parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roads which are under the control of the commission and who shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the commission, with such other assistants and at such salaries payable out of the park fund as may be authorized by the commission, with the approval of the mayor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-207 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-212. Expenditures for park purposes.

The commission, with the approval of the mayor, shall have full, complete, and exclusive power and authority to expend, for and on behalf of the city, all sums of money that may be raised by general taxation for park purposes, all other sums of money appropriated by the governing body from the general revenues for the same purposes, and all moneys that may be realized by the commission from the sale of privileges in or near the parks of the city or realized from the sale of the general bonds of the city and set apart for park purposes or from the sale of the park bonds provided for in section 31-25-203 (2).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-209 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-213. Fiscal year - annual report.

The fiscal year of the park commission shall end on December 31 of each year. During the month of January of each year the commission shall make an annual report to the mayor and the governing body of all moneys received and expended in the purchase, improvement, and maintenance of parks. The report shall show when, where, how, and in what manner the same were received and expended and what improvements have been made during the year preceding the report.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1177, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-210 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-214. Park fund - certified vouchers.

The park fund shall consist of moneys levied, collected, and appropriated therefor and coming into the fund by donation or otherwise. All moneys collected and credited to the park fund shall be used for the maintenance and improvement of parks, parkways, boulevards, avenues, driveways, and roads and shall be expended by the commission as in its judgment the needs of such property require. The same shall be drawn upon the proper officers of such city upon vouchers properly authenticated by the president and secretary of the park commission.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-214 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-215. Maximum tax levy - moneys credited.

As a part of the annual levies authorized by law, the governing body shall annually levy, assess, and collect upon each dollar of taxable property within the city not more than one and one-half mills for the purposes of said park fund, the proceeds of which shall be collected in the same manner as other city taxes and shall be appropriated by the governing body for the park fund.

All moneys collected, received, levied, or appropriated by the governing body for park purposes shall be deposited in the treasury of such city to the credit of the park fund and shall be kept separate and apart from other moneys of such city. Any portion thereof remaining unexpended at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time shall not in any event be converted into the general fund nor be subject to appropriation for general purposes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-215 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-216. Cities control park grounds outside limits.

In all cases where any city, or any city or city and county organized under a special charter or created under the state constitution, has acquired lands outside its municipal limits for parks, parkways, boulevards, or roads, said city or city and county has full police power and jurisdiction and full municipal control and full power and authority in the management, control, improvement, and maintenance of and over any such lands so acquired. It has power and authority to provide by ordinance for the regulation and control of its lands so acquired, to prevent the commission of any acts which are or may be declared unlawful pursuant to the provisions of this part 2, and to prosecute and punish the violation of any ordinances in its municipal courts. Such city or city and county also has like power and jurisdiction to prevent pollution of the water in all reservoirs, streams, and pipes which may be included within any such parks, parkways, boulevards, or roads and over the stream or source from which such water is taken as far as ten miles above the point from which it is diverted. Such city or city and county has like power and jurisdiction to regulate and prevent the erection, construction, and maintenance, within three hundred feet of any such park, parkway, boulevard, or road outside its municipal limits, of any advertisement or of any billboard or other structure for advertisements. Such city or city and county also has like power and jurisdiction over the use of any public roads, boulevards, or parkways within such parks and running over or through or between such lands and any public roads, boulevards, or parkways between any such park or pleasure ground and its municipal boundaries and not included within the municipal limits of any incorporated city or town.

In all cases where the right to take private property for public use without the owner's consent or to acquire lands for parks, parkways, boulevards, or roads outside the municipal limits of any such city or city and county is conferred by general laws or by the charter of any such city or city and county, it is lawful for any such city or city and county, or the department or branch thereof having authority in the premises, to take, by right of eminent domain, the property so sought to be taken and appropriated, such condemnation proceedings to be in accordance with the general laws of the state, insofar as the same are applicable, relating to any such city or city and county. The power and authority to so acquire lands for such purposes outside the municipal limits of any such city or city and county by gift, devise, purchase, or right of eminent domain is granted by this section, subject to the limitation imposed by section 31-25-201 (1).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 1265, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-219 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1983 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 367, Session Laws of Colorado 1983.

31-25-217. Management - licenses - franchises.

The commission shall have exclusive management and control of all parks, pleasure grounds, boulevards, parkways, avenues, driveways, and roads, as mentioned in section 31-25-201, and exclusive power to lay out, regulate, and improve the same, to prohibit certain or heavy traffic therein and thereon, and to grant or refuse licenses to sell goods on the streets or sidewalks within three hundred feet of any park entrance and on the streets and sidewalks adjoining parks. The commission shall establish and maintain necessary rules and regulations for the proper supervision and government thereof and shall have such additional powers as may be prescribed by ordinance. The governing body shall provide, by ordinance, for the enforcement of the rules and orders of the commission.

No franchise, license, or permit for the construction or maintenance of any railway shall ever be granted within the limits of any park or pleasure ground or lengthwise upon any boulevard, parkway, avenue, driveway, or road, nor shall any franchise for the maintenance of any other special privilege within any park or pleasure ground be granted.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1179, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-211 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-218. Conservation trust fund authorized.

Each city in this state, including home rule and special territorial charter cities, may create a conservation trust fund as provided in section 29-21-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1179, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 139-88-20 as it existed prior to 1975. (See L. 74, p. 434, § 5.) This section was renumbered on revision as § 31-25-220, but was never printed as such in C.R.S. 1973.